Hawaii statutes.
§805-4 Service of summons. The summons
shall be served by handing the accused a copy thereof, and showing the accused
the original; or, if the accused cannot be found, by leaving the copy, during
business hours, at the accused's usual place of business or employment, or by
leaving the copy at the accused's place of residence, at any reasonable hour,
in charge of some person of discretion. If the alleged offender fails to
appear at the prescribed time and place, after having been so summoned, the
alleged offender may be attached for contempt, and dealt with accordingly. [L
1892, c 57, §20; RL 1925, §4009; RL 1935, §5472; RL 1945, §10772; RL 1955,
§257-4; HRS §710-4; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Law Journals and Reviews

Section authorizes magistrate to issue bench warrant on
charge of contempt where man has failed to respond to a penal summons. Haw.
Supp., 3 HBJ, no. 3, at 22 (1965).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next